Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Burglary and Criminal Intrusion
§ 6-3-302.
Criminal entry; penalties; affirmative defenses.

A person is guilty of criminal entry if, without authority, he knowingly enters a building, occupied structure, vehicle or cargo portion of a truck or trailer, or a separately secured or occupied portion of those enclosures.

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that:

The entry was made because of a mistake of fact or to preserve life or property in an emergency;

The enclosure was abandoned;

The enclosure was at the time open to the public and the person complied with all lawful conditions imposed on access to or remaining in the enclosure; or

The person reasonably believed that the owner of the enclosure, or other person empowered to license access to the enclosure, would have authorized him to enter.

Criminal entry is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “occupied structure,” see §

6-1-104

.

Burglary distinguished. —

Burglary and criminal trespass (now criminal entry) are, by design, separate and distinct violations of the law. The essential difference between the two crimes is the element of specific intent to steal or commit a felony therein found in the burglary section. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Self-induced intoxication entitles burglary defendant to criminal-entry instruction. —

In a burglary prosecution, given the evidence on self-induced intoxication, which could have been considered to determine whether the defendant was capable of forming the specific intent necessary to steal or deprive a person of his property, the defendant was entitled to an instruction on the lesser-included offense of criminal entry, and the court's failure to give it was reversible error. Eatherton v. State, 761 P.2d 91,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1988).

The court was required to instruct the jury on the lesser included offense of criminal entry, where the jury could infer from the evidence that the defendant was too intoxicated to form the specific intent requisite for a conviction of the charge of burglary, but still could decide that he had committed the offense of unlawful entry. Keller v. State, 771 P.2d 379,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1989).

Instruction on lesser included offense properly refused. —

Where, in a prosecution for burglary, the defendant's offered instruction would have directed the jury to return a verdict of guilty of the lesser included offense of criminal trespass (now criminal entry), even in the face of obviously sufficient evidence of intent to steal, the instruction was properly refused. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

In burglary trial, trial court properly refused to give instructions on the lesser included offense of criminal entry where the defendant's theory of the case was that he never entered the burglarized vehicle at all. Collins v. State, 854 P.2d 688,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. July 20, 1993).

Stated

in

Boyd v. State, 747 P.2d 1143,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1987); Foote v. State, 751 P.2d 884,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1988); WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

CSC v. State, 2005 WY 106, 118 P.3d 970,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Aug 30, 2005).Smith v. State, 598 P.2d 1389,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1979); Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002); Young v. State, 2005 WY 136, 121 P.3d 145,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(2005).

Quoted in

Wiese v. State, 2016 WY 72, 375 P.3d 805,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2016).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is “building” or “house” within burglary or breaking-and-entering statute, 68 ALR4th 425.

§ 6-3-303.
Criminal trespass; penalties.

A person is guilty of criminal trespass if he enters or remains on or in the land or premises of another person, knowing he is not authorized to do so, or after being notified to depart or to not trespass. For purposes of this section, notice is given by:

Personal communication to the person by the owner or occupant, or his agent, or by a peace officer; or

Posting of signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders.

Criminal trespass is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

This section does not supersede W.S.

1-21-1003

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty of stock drover to prevent his livestock from trespassing upon the property of another, see §

11-20-119

.

As to penalty for trespass upon lands owned by state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-130

.

As to hunting and fishing on the property of another without permission, see §

23-3-305

.

As to penalty for trespass upon state lands after cancellation or expiration of lease, see §

36-9-116

.

As to right of power district to inspect and repair power lines without liability for trespass, see §

37-7-123

.

As to malicious trespass against electric utility poles or wires, see §

37-12-120

.

Editor's notes. —

Section

1-21-1003

, referred to in subsection (c), relates to notice required to an adverse party before commencement of an action for forcible entry or detainer.

This section was not designed to resolve civil property disputes.

United States v. Miller, 659 F.2d 1029, 1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 17693 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1981).

The requirement of an intent to remain upon the lands of another without lawful authority causes this section to be inapplicable in determining the questions of title or right to possession where the act which was the subject of the prosecution was a good faith one under a claim of right. United States v. Miller, 659 F.2d 1029, 1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 17693 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1981).

Entry onto land by brand inspector consistent with statutoryauthority. —

An involuntary bailment was created when the parents took their daughter to live elsewhere but kept her horse, and the parents, as involuntary bailees, had an absolute duty to return the property when the daughter terminated the bailment; consequently, the brand inspector's action in entering the parents' land to retrieve the daughter's horse for transfer to the daughter's agent was consistent with his statutory authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 11-20-203(a), 205(a), 214(a), and constituted neither criminal trespass nor larceny. Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

Entry by federal agents. —

Court of appeals affirmed the district court's judgment removing a criminal case the State of Wyoming filed in state court against a federal agent and a contractor who was working for the U.S. Government, which charged them with violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-3-303(a) and 6-3-204(a), and dismissing the charges, because activities the agent and contractor were conducting to locate gray wolves and place radio collars on them were authorized by federal regulations, and their conduct was objectively reasonable at the time they trespassed on private land. Wyoming v. Livingston, 443 F.3d 1211,

2006 U.S. App. LEXIS 8502

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 549 U.S. 1019, 127 S. Ct. 553, 166 L. Ed. 2d 409, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 8388 (U.S. 2006).

Quoted

in

Salisbury Livestock Co. v. Colorado Cent. Credit Union, 793 P.2d 470,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Martin v. Struthers, 319 U.S. 141, 63 S. Ct. 862, 87 L. Ed. 1313, 1943 U.S. LEXIS 1188 (1943); Lascano v. State, 2011 WY 144, 262 P.3d 1259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Oct. 19, 2011); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Trespass: state prosecution for unauthorized entry or occupation, for public demonstration purposes, of business, industrial or utility premises, 41 ALR4th 773.

Entry on private lands in pursuit of wounded game as criminal trespass, 41 ALR4th 805.

“Choice of evils,” necessity, duress, or similar defense to state or local criminal charges based on acts of public protest, 3 ALR5th 521.

§ 6-3-304.
Possession of burglar's tools; penalties.

A person is guilty of possession of burglar’s tools if he possesses an explosive, tool, instrument or other article adapted, designed or commonly used for committing or facilitating the commission of a crime involving forcible entry into buildings or occupied structures with intent to use the article possessed in the commission of such a crime.

Possession of burglar’s tools is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “occupied structure,” see §

6-1-104

.

Quoted

in

State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Grubbs v. State, 669 P.2d 929,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of statutes relating to burglars' tools, 33 ALR3d 798.

§ 6-3-305.
Breaking, opening or entering of coin machine with intent to commit theft; penalties.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if he breaks, opens or enters a coin machine with intent to commit theft.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “coin machine,” see §

6-1-104

.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “theft” for “larceny” at the end of the provision.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “coin machine,” see §

6-1-104

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-306.
Forcible entry or detainer; penalty.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), if he violently takes or keeps possession of land without authority of law.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to jurisdiction and procedure of civil action of forcible entry or detainer, see §§

1-21-1001

to

1-21-1016

.

As to jurisdiction of the circuit court relative to forcible entry or detainer, see §

5-9-128

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-307.
Unlawful entry into an occupied structure; penalty.

A person is guilty of unlawful entry into an occupied structure if, without authority, he enters or remains in an occupied structure and attempts to commit or commits battery as defined in W.S.

6-2-501

or domestic battery as defined in W.S.

6-2-511

.

Unlawful entry into an occupied structure is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

As used in this section:

“Occupied structure” means a structure, other than a vehicle, whether or not a person is actually present:

Where any person lives; or

Which is used for overnight accommodation or overnight shelter of persons.

History:

2014 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 11, § 2 makes this act effective July 1, 2014.

Jurisdiction.—

In a case in which defendant pleaded no contest to child abuse and unlawful entry into an occupied structure after he entered the home where his estranged wife and teenage son (the victim) were residing and hit the victim with a wooden shovel handle, defendant waived his challenge to the unlawful entry charge when he pleaded no contest. An alleged defect in the information concerning the victim’s age was not jurisdictional because it did not involve the power of the State to bring defendant into court to answer the charge brought against him. Dahl v. State, 2020 WY 59, 462 P.3d 912,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2020).